test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_O_NoExtra_skatig_gt-norm.yaml
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: skatigenhimibanan
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: skatigenhimibanag
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: skatigenhimibaning
     skatig+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: skatigenhim***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: skatigenhim***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: skatigenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     skatig+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: skatigensishinaaniban
     skatig+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: skatigensishinaan***idig, idog***
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: skatigensishiwaaiban
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: skatigensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: skatigensishiniiban
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: skatigensishini***idig, idog***
     skatig+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: skatigenhishinaaniban
     skatig+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: skatigenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: skatigenhishiwaaiban
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: skatigenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: skatigenhishiniiban
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: skatigenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     skatig+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: skatigensishinaanan
     skatig+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: skatigensishinaanag
     skatig+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: skatigensishinaaning
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: skatigensishiwaaan
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: skatigensishiwaaag
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: skatigensishiwaaing
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: skatigensishinian
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: skatigensishiniag
     skatig+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: skatigensishiniing
     skatig+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: skatigenhishinaanan
     skatig+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: skatigenhishinaanag
     skatig+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: skatigenhishinaaning
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: skatigenhishiwaaan
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: skatigenhishiwaaag
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: skatigenhishiwaaing
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: skatigenhishinian
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: skatigenhishiniag
     skatig+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: skatigenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     skatig+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: skatigensishibanan
     skatig+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: skatigensishibanag
     skatig+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: skatigensishibaning
     skatig+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: skatigensish***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: skatigensish***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: skatigensish***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: skatigenhishibanan
     skatig+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: skatigenhishibanag
     skatig+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: skatigenhishibaning
     skatig+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: skatigenhish***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: skatigenhish***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: skatigenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: skatigensinaanibanan
     skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: skatigensinaanibanag
     skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: skatigensinaanibaning
     skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: skatigensinaan***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: skatigensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: skatigensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: skatigensiwaaibanan
     skatig+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: skatigensiwaaibanag
     skatig+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: skatigensiwaaibaning
     skatig+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: skatigensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: skatigensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: skatigensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: skatigensiniibanan
     skatig+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: skatigensiniibanag
     skatig+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: skatigensiniibaning
     skatig+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: skatigensini***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: skatigensini***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: skatigensini***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: skatigenhinaanibanan
     skatig+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: skatigenhinaanibanag
     skatig+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: skatigenhinaanibaning
     skatig+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: skatigenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: skatigenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: skatigenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: skatigenhiwaaibanan
     skatig+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: skatigenhiwaaibanag
     skatig+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: skatigenhiwaaibaning
     skatig+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: skatigenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: skatigenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: skatigenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: skatigenhiniibanan
     skatig+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: skatigenhiniibanag
     skatig+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: skatigenhiniibaning
     skatig+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: skatigenhini***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: skatigenhini***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: skatigenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     skatig+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: skatigimishinaaniban
     skatig+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: skatigimishinaan***idig, idog***
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: skatigimishiwaaiban
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: skatigimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: skatigimishiniiban
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: skatigimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     skatig+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: skatigimishinaanan
     skatig+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: skatigimishinaanag
     skatig+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: skatigimishinaaning
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: skatigimishiwaaan
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: skatigimishiwaaag
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: skatigimishiwaaing
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: skatigimishinian
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: skatigimishiniag
     skatig+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: skatigimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: skatigimishibanan
     skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: skatigimishibanag
     skatig+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: skatigimishibaning
     skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: skatigimish***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: skatigimish***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: skatigimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: skatigiminaanibanan
     skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: skatigiminaanibanag
     skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: skatigiminaanibaning
     skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: skatigiminaan***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: skatigiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: skatigiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: skatigimiwaaibanan
     skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: skatigimiwaaibanag
     skatig+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: skatigimiwaaibaning
     skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: skatigimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: skatigimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: skatigimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: skatigiminiibanan
     skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: skatigiminiibanag
     skatig+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: skatigiminiibaning
     skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: skatigimini***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: skatigimini***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: skatigimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: skatigishinaanibanan
     skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: skatigishinaanibanag
     skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: skatigishinaanibaning
     skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: skatigishinaan***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: skatigishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: skatigishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: skatigishiwaaibanan
     skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: skatigishiwaaibanag
     skatig+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: skatigishiwaaibaning
     skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: skatigishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: skatigishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: skatigishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: skatigishiniibanan
     skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: skatigishiniibanag
     skatig+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: skatigishiniibaning
     skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: skatigishini***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: skatigishini***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: skatigishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niskatigensimishinaan
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niskatigensimishiwaa
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niskatigensimishini
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niskatigenhimishinaan
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niskatigenhimishiwaa
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niskatigenhimishini
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giskatigensimishinaan
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giskatigensimishiwaa
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: giskatigensimishini
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giskatigenhimishinaan
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giskatigenhimishiwaa
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: giskatigenhimishini
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: oskatigensimishinaan
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: oskatigensimishiwaa
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: oskatigensimishini
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: oskatigenhimishinaan
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: oskatigenhimishiwaa
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: oskatigenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: niskatigensimishiban
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: niskatigensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: niskatigenhimishiban
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: niskatigenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: giskatigensimishiban
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: giskatigensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: giskatigenhimishiban
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: giskatigenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: oskatigensimishiban
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: oskatigensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: oskatigenhimishiban
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: oskatigenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: niskatigensimishan
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: niskatigensimishag
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: niskatigensimishing
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: niskatigenhimishan
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: niskatigenhimishag
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: niskatigenhimishing
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: giskatigensimishan
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: giskatigensimishag
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: giskatigensimishing
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: giskatigenhimishan
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: giskatigenhimishag
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: giskatigenhimishing
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: oskatigensimishan
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: oskatigensimishag
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: oskatigensimishing
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: oskatigenhimishan
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: oskatigenhimishag
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: oskatigenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: niskatigensiminaaniban
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niskatigensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: niskatigensimiwaaiban
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: niskatigensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: niskatigensiminiiban
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: niskatigensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: niskatigenhiminaaniban
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niskatigenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: niskatigenhimiwaaiban
